Missouri, session 2026, HB2506.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 210, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 210.253, to read as follows:
210.253. The office of childhood shall design and develop placards that include a
QR code that contains a link to a facility's complaint investigation and inspection
reports. Complaint investigations shall appear in the search results in a timely manner
clearly differentiating such investigations from other inspection reports. By January 1,
2027, the office of childhood shall distribute such placards to all licensed child care
facilities. Each facility shall post such placard in a conspicuous place, with the state
license, at the entrance of the facility. Inspection reports, complaint investigations, and
related reports shall appear for a period of three years, after which a facility may
request such investigations and reports be removed by the department.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.